Utah, session 2026, HB356.
Section 1. Section 31A-46-311 is amended to read:31A-46-311. Prohibited actions with respect to the 340B drug discount program.(1)As used in this section,:(a)"340B covered entity" means the same as the term "covered entity" is defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 256b(a)(4).(b)"340B eligible drug" means a drug purchased through the 340B drug discount program, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 256b, by a 340B covered entity.(c)"Contracted pharmacy" means a pharmacy contracting with a 340B covered entity to dispense 340B eligible drugs.(d)"manufacturer""Manufacturer" means a pharmaceutical manufacturer, including an agent or affiliate of a pharmaceutical manufacturer.(e)"Pharmacy" means any place where drugs are dispensed.(2)A manufacturer may not:(a)directly or indirectly restrict or prohibit:(i)a pharmacy from contracting with a 340B covered entity, including by denying the pharmacy access to a drug that is manufactured by the manufacturer;(ii)a 340B covered entity from contracting with a pharmacy, including by denying the 340B covered entity access to a drug that is manufactured by the manufacturer;(iii)the acquisition, dispensing, or delivery of a 340B eligible drug to any location authorized by a 340B covered entity to receive the drug, unless prohibited by federal law; or(iv)a 340B covered entity from receiving 340B drug discount program pricing for a 340B eligible drug, including by imposing a time limitation on a 340B covered entity to replenish or submit a claim for a 340B eligible drug;(b)directly or indirectly:(i)require a 340B covered entity to purchase a 340B eligible drug from a supplier if the manufacturer would otherwise permit the 340B covered entity to purchase a drug that is not a 340B eligible drug from the supplier; or(ii)require a 340B covered entity or a contracted pharmacy to submit any claim data, utilization data, or information about a 340B covered entity's contracts with a third-party, unless the data or information sharing is required by federal law, as a condition for allowing: (A)the acquisition of a 340B eligible drug by, a 340B covered entity; or (B)delivery of a 340B eligible drug to, a 340B covered entity, unless the data or information sharing is required by federal law or a contracted pharmacy; or(c)interfere with:(i)a contract between a pharmacy and a 340B covered entity; or(ii)the ability of a pharmacy and a 340B covered entity to enter into a contract.(3)The Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program created in Section 49-20-103 may adjust the program's business practices to mitigate any financial impacts resulting from this section.(4)Nothing in this section is to be construed to conflict with federal law.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect:(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), May 6, 2026; or(2)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(a)upon approval by the governor;(b)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(c)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.